Massachusetts, session 194th, H4088.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) There shall be a special commission established to modernize the language defining
disabled veteran pursuant to the eighth paragraph of section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws
and in all other registry of motor vehicle laws and regulations pertaining to disabled veterans.
(b) The commission shall consist of 9 members that shall include: the director of the
registry of motor vehicles or the director's designee, who shall serve as co-chair; the veteran
advocate of the office of the veteran advocate or the advocate’s designee, who shall serve as co-
chair; 1 member appointed by the attorney general that shall be a representative from Disability
Law Center; 1 member appointed by the Disabled American Veterans that shall be an expert in
veteran prosthetics; 1 member appointed by the governor that shall be a representative from the
of 2

city of Boston’s US Department of Veterans Affairs healthcare system that shall be a senior
health care provider and researcher; 2 members appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives that shall be members of the house of representatives, 1 of whom shall be a
veteran; and 2 members appointed by the senate president that shall be members of the senate, 1
of whom shall be a veteran.
(c) The commission shall prepare a report on its activities and on any findings and
recommendations for proposed legislation. Not later than 1 year after the enactment of the
special commission, the report shall be submitted to the: (i) chairs of the joint committee on
veterans and federal affairs; (ii) chairs of the joint committee on transportation; (iii) chairs of the
senate and house committees on ways and means; and (iv) offices of the house and senate clerk.
of 2